Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
Article 12 Revisions to Article 9 Filing

11-12-101.
Effective date.

This article shall become effective at 12:01 A.M. on January 1, 1995.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-12-101, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1550, § 7; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1693, § 13.

11-12-102.
Transition provisions.

A financing statement or continuation statement filed prior to January 1, 1995, which has not lapsed prior to January 1, 1995, shall remain effective for the period provided in Code Section 11-9-403 as in effect immediately prior to January 1, 1995.

The effectiveness of any financing statement or continuation statement filed prior to January 1, 1995, may be continued only by the filing of a continuation statement, in the form prescribed by the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority, signed by either the debtor or the secured party with the filing officer of the county where the original financing statement was filed or, if the financing statement has previously been continued, where the currently effective continuation statement was filed. If the original financing statement or currently effective continuation statement was filed in multiple counties, then such continuation statement may be filed in any of such multiple counties, except where the original financing statement or currently effective continuation statement covers crops growing or to be grown, or minerals or the like, including oil and gas, or accounts subject to subsection (5) of Code Section 11-9-103, or was filed as a fixture filing (Code Section 11-9-313), then such continuation statement must be filed in each of such counties where any of the related real estate is located. This continuation statement must contain the information required by the first sentence of subsection (1) of Code Section 11-9-402, other than a statement indicating the types, or describing the items, of collateral and the social security number or Internal Revenue Service taxpayer identification number of the debtor, and must further identify the original financing statement or currently effective continuation statement, the office where such financing statement or continuation statement was filed, and the filing number and date of filing or other recording information, and further state that the original financing statement is still effective.Except as specified in this subsection, the provisions of subsection (3) of Code Section 11-9-403 for continuation statements apply to such a statement.

Statements of amendment, assignment, release, or termination affecting original financing statements filed prior to January 1, 1995, (“transitional filings”) shall be filed on the forms prescribed by the Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority with the filing officer of the county where the original financing statement was filed, or if the original financing statement has previously been continued, where the currently effective continuation statement was filed.If the original financing statement or currently effective continuation statement was filed in multiple counties, then such statement of amendment, assignment, release, or termination may be filed in any one of such multiple counties, except where the original financing statement or currently effective continuation statement covers crops growing or to be grown, or minerals or the like, including oil and gas, or accounts subject to subsection (5) of Code Section 11-9-103, or was filed as a fixture filing (Code Section 11-9-313), in which event such statement of amendment, assignment, release, or termination must be filed in each of such counties where any of the related real estate is located.Each transitional filing shall identify the original financing statement or currently effective continuation statement, the office where such financing statement or continuation statement was filed, the filing number or other recording information, and identify each named debtor and secured party. Notwithstanding the requirements of subsection (2) of Code Section 11-9-405 or Code Section 11-9-406, no social security number or Internal Revenue Service taxpayer identification number of the debtor shall be required to be included in any such transitional filings.The Georgia Superior Court Clerks’ Cooperative Authority shall prescribe rules and regulations, as appropriate, to govern the presentation of such transitional filings.

A filing which was made in good faith in an improper place or not in all of the places required by Code Section 11-9-401 as in effect prior to January 1, 1995, is nevertheless effective with regard to any collateral as to which the filing complied with the requirements of this article and is also effective with regard to collateral covered by the financing statement against any person who has knowledge of the contents of such financing statement.

A filing which was made in the proper place in this state pursuant to Code Section 11-9-401 as in effect prior to January 1, 1995, continues effective even though the debtor’s residence or place of business or the location of the collateral or its use, whichever controlled the original filing, is thereafter changed.

A continuation statement that was timely filed pursuant to subsection (8) of Code Section 11-9-403 as in effect prior to January 1, 1995, and that remains in effect as of January 1, 1995, shall continue the effectiveness of the original financing statement for the period specified in subsection (8) of Code Section 11-9-403 as in effect on January 1, 1995, provided that such continuation statement may thereafter be further continued by the filing of a subsequent continuation statement within six months prior to the expiration of the five-year period specified in subsection (8) of Code Section 11-9-403 as in effect prior to January 1, 1995, or, if such five-year period is determined to have a different duration, within six months prior to the expiration of the five-year period specified in subsection (8) of Code Section 11-9-403 as in effect on January 1, 1995.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-12-102, enacted by Ga. L. 1993, p. 1550, § 7; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1693, § 13.